Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0411

Voting by patron members.

Except as provided by RCW 23.100.0412(1), each patron member has one vote. The organic rules may allocate voting power among patron members as provided in RCW 23.100.0412(1).

[ 2019 c 37 s 411.]